Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 1 DEFINITIONS
§ 49-121. Definitions — T.

“Temporary supplemental lot” means a location other than the principal place of business, or supplemental lot within the same or adjacent county as the principal place of business, where a licensed dealer may secure a license to conduct the business and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten (10) days for a specific purpose such as auto shows, auctions, shopping center promotions, tent sales, etc. Temporary supplemental lots shall meet all local zoning and building codes for the type of business being conducted. The requirements for a principal place of business shall not be applicable to temporary supplemental lot locations. The adjacent county restriction shall not apply if the dealer holds the franchise for the products to be displayed or sold and has approval from a manufacturer for the location where the proposed temporary supplemental lot license will be issued by the department. Nonfranchised dealers shall be permitted to temporarily display or sell their products within a one hundred seventy-five (175) mile radius of their principal place of business, upon approval by the department.

“Tires” means:

Metal. Every tire the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material.

Pneumatic. Every tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load.

Snow tire. Every rubber tire with tread design or material embedded in the tire to improve winter traction except studded tires.

Solid rubber. Every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air for the support of the load.

Studded tire. Every tire with built-in lugs of tungsten carbide or other suitable material designed to contact the road surface for improved winter traction.

“Traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel.

“Traffic lane” or “lane of travel” means that portion of the roadway for movement of a single line of vehicles.

“Traffic-control device” means any device, whether manually, electrically or mechanically operated, placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning or guiding traffic.

“Trailer” means:

General. Every vehicle without motive power designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle.

Fifth-wheel trailer. A vehicular unit equipped in the same manner as a travel trailer but constructed with a raised forward section that allows a bi-level floor plan. This style is designed to be towed by a vehicle equipped with a device known as a fifth-wheel hitch, which is typically installed in the bed of a pickup truck.

Fold down camping trailer. A vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls, which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters, for recreational, camping or travel use.

Pole trailer. Every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach or pole or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections.

Semitrailer. Every vehicle without motive power, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by the towing vehicle.

Travel trailer. A vehicular unit, mounted on wheels designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, travel or emergency use and of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when towed by a motorized vehicle.

Utility trailer. (See “Utility trailer,” section 49-122, Idaho Code)

“Transitional ownership document” means a document used to perfect a lien against creditors or subsequent purchasers when the primary ownership document is not available and the selling dealer, new security interest holder or their agent, to the best of their knowledge, will not have possession of the primary ownership document, within thirty (30) days of the sale, or if no sale is involved, the date the contract or security agreement being perfected was signed, and contains all of the following:

The date of sale or if no sale is involved, the date the contract or security agreement being perfected was signed;

The name and address of each owner of the vehicle;

The name and address of each security interest holder;

If there are multiple security interest holders, the priorities of interest if the security interest holders do not jointly hold a single security interest;

The vehicle identification number;

The name of the security interest holder or person who submits the transitional ownership document for the security interest holder; and

Any other information the department may require for its records.

“Transportation,” for the purposes of chapter 22, title 49, Idaho Code, means the movement of any regulated quantity of hazardous material or hazardous waste within, through, or to any destination in this state upon the highways of this state.

“Transporter” means every person engaged in the business of delivering vehicles of a type required to be registered from a manufacturing, assembling or distributing plant to dealers or sales agents of a manufacturer, except in chapter 22, title 49, Idaho Code, where it means any person who transports a hazardous material or hazardous waste within, through, or to any destination upon the highways of this state.

“Truck” means:

Refuse/sanitation. Any vehicle designed and used solely for the purpose of transporting refuse.

General. Every motor vehicle exceeding eight thousand (8,000) pounds gross weight designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

Pickup truck. Every motor vehicle eight thousand (8,000) pounds gross weight or less which is designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

Truck camper. A portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor, and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck, and containing at least one (1) of the following facilities: stove; refrigerator or icebox; self-contained toilet; heater or air conditioner; potable water supply including a faucet and sink; separate 110-125 volt electrical power supply; or LP-gas supply. Truck campers originally constructed with an overall length of six (6) feet or longer shall be titled as provided in chapter 5 of this title 49. A truck camper does not include pickup hoods, shells or canopies.

Truck tractor. Every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles but not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn.

“True mileage driven” means the mileage of the vehicle as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

§ 49-122. Definitions — U.

“Unauthorized vehicle” means any vehicle parked or otherwise left on private property without the consent of the person owning or controlling that property.

“United States” means the fifty (50) states and the District of Columbia.

“Unladen weight.” (See “Light weight,” section 49-113, Idaho Code)

“Unregistered vehicle” means a vehicle without current registration on file with the department or with the appropriate agency of another state, unless exempt from registration.

“Unusual noise.” (See “Excessive,” section 49-106, Idaho Code)

“Urban district.” (See “District,” section 49-105, Idaho Code)

“Utility trailer” means a trailer or semitrailer designed primarily to be drawn behind a passenger car or pickup truck for domestic and utility purposes. Utility or domestic use shall include a farm trailer while being used to haul agricultural products or livestock from farm to storage, market or processing plant, or returning therefrom.

“Utility type vehicle” or “UTV” means a utility type vehicle or UTV as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.

§ 49-122A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-123. Definitions — V.

“Variable load suspension axle” means an axle or axles designed to support a part of the vehicle and load and which can be regulated to vary the amount of load supported by such an axle or axles and which can be deployed or lifted by the operator of the vehicle. (See also section 49-117, Idaho Code)

“Fully raised” means that the variable load suspension axle is in an elevated position preventing the tires on such axle from having any contact with the roadway.

“Fully deployed” means that the variable load suspension axle is supporting a portion of the weight of the loaded vehicle as controlled by the preset pressure regulator valve.

“Vehicle” means:

General. Every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

Assembled vehicle or vessel. A vehicle or vessel, not including a salvage vehicle or vessel, that has been constructed using major component parts from two (2) or more vehicles or vessels or that has been repaired using new factory major component parts so that the resulting vehicle or vessel has the same appearance as a vehicle or vessel that was manufactured under a specific make and model by a manufacturer. A vehicle or vessel utilizing a kit for the entire body or a glider kit vehicle is not an assembled vehicle.

Authorized emergency vehicle. Vehicles operated by any fire department or law enforcement agency of the state of Idaho or any political subdivision of the state, ambulances, vehicles belonging to personnel of voluntary fire departments while in performance of official duties only, vehicles belonging to or operated by EMS personnel certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS bureau of the Idaho department of health and welfare while in the performance of emergency medical services, sheriff’s search and rescue vehicles that are under the immediate supervision of the county sheriff, wreckers that are engaged in motor vehicle recovery operations and are blocking part or all of one (1) or more lanes of traffic, other emergency vehicles designated by the director of the Idaho state police or vehicles authorized by the Idaho transportation board and used in the enforcement of laws specified in section 40-510, Idaho Code, pertaining to vehicles of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or greater.

Commercial vehicle or commercial motor vehicle. For the purposes of chapters 3 and 9 of this title, driver’s licenses and vehicle equipment, a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles designed or used to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a manufacturer’s gross combination weight rating (GCWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds inclusive of a towed unit with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of more than ten thousand (10,000) pounds; or

Has a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds; or

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people, including the driver; or

Is of any size and is used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous for the purposes of the hazardous material transportation act and which require the motor vehicle to be placarded under the hazardous materials regulations (49 CFR part 172, subpart F).
For the purposes of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, motor vehicle registration, a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a type used or maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation or profit, or the transportation of property for the owner of the vehicle, or for hire, compensation, or profit, and shall include fixed load specially constructed vehicles exceeding the limits imposed by chapter 10, title 49, Idaho Code, and including drilling rigs, construction, drilling and wrecker cranes, log jammers, log loaders, and similar vehicles which are normally operated in an overweight or oversize condition or both, but shall not include those vehicles registered pursuant to sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, or exempted by section 49-426, Idaho Code. A motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement that has a seating capacity for not more than fifteen (15) persons, including the driver, shall not be a “commercial vehicle” under the provisions of this title relating to equipment requirements, rules of the road, or registration.

Farm vehicle. A vehicle or combination of vehicles owned by a farmer or rancher, or by his designated agent, which are operated over public highways, and used exclusively to transport unprocessed agricultural products raised, owned or grown by the owner of the vehicle to market or place of storage; and shall include the transportation by the farmer or rancher of any equipment, supplies or products purchased by that farmer or rancher for his own use, and used in the farming or ranching operation or used by a farmer partly in transporting agricultural products or livestock from the farm of another farmer that were originally grown or raised on the farm, or when used partly in transporting agricultural supplies, equipment, materials or livestock to the farm of another farmer for use or consumption on the farm but not transported for hire, and shall not include vehicles of husbandry or vehicles registered pursuant to sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code.

Foreign vehicle. Every vehicle of a type required to be registered under the provisions of this title brought into this state from another state, territory or country other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer and not registered in this state.

Glider kit vehicle. Every large truck manufactured from a kit manufactured by a manufacturer of large trucks which consists of a frame, cab complete with wiring, instruments, fenders and hood and front axles and wheels. The “glider kit” is made into a complete assembly by the addition of the engine, transmission, rear axles, wheels and tires.

Motor vehicle. Every vehicle that is self-propelled, and for the purpose of titling and registration meets federal motor vehicle safety standards as defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code. Motor vehicle does not include vehicles moved solely by human power, electric personal assistive mobility devices, personal delivery devices, electric-assisted bicycles, and motorized wheelchairs or other such vehicles that are specifically exempt from titling or registration requirements under title 49, Idaho Code.

Multipurpose passenger vehicle (MPV). For the purposes of section 49-966, Idaho Code, a motor vehicle designed to carry ten (10) or fewer persons which is constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features for occasional off-road operation.

Neighborhood electric vehicle (NEV). A self-propelled, electrically powered, four-wheeled motor vehicle which is emission free and conforms to the definition and requirements for low-speed vehicles as adopted in the federal motor vehicle safety standards for low-speed vehicles under federal regulations at 49 CFR part 571. An NEV shall be titled, registered and insured according to law as provided respectively in chapters 4, 5 and 12, title 49, Idaho Code, and shall only be operated by a licensed driver. Operation of an NEV on a highway shall be allowed as provided in section 49-663, Idaho Code.

Noncommercial vehicle. For the purposes of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, motor vehicle registration, a noncommercial vehicle shall not include those vehicles required to be registered under sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, and means all other vehicles or combinations of vehicles which are not commercial vehicles or farm vehicles, but shall include motor homes. A noncommercial vehicle shall include those vehicles having a combined gross weight not in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds and not held out for hire, used for purposes related to private use and not used in the furtherance of a business or occupation for compensation or profit or for transporting goods for other than the owner.

Passenger car. For the purposes of section 49-966, Idaho Code, a motor vehicle, except a multipurpose passenger vehicle, motorcycle or trailer, designed to carry ten (10) or fewer persons.

Rebuilt salvage vehicle or vessel. Every vehicle or vessel previously determined or declared to be a salvage vehicle that has been rebuilt or repaired using like make and model parts and visually appears as a vehicle or vessel that was originally constructed under a distinctive manufacturer. This includes a salvage vehicle or vessel which is damaged to the extent that a “rebuilt salvage” brand is required to be added to the title.

Replica vehicle or vessel. A vehicle or vessel made to replicate any vehicle or vessel previously manufactured, using metal, fiberglass or other composite materials. Replica vehicles must look like the original vehicle being replicated but may use a more modern drive train. At a minimum, replica vehicles shall meet the same federal motor vehicle safety and emission standards in effect for the year and type of vehicle being replicated.

Salvage vehicle or vessel. Any vehicle or vessel for which a salvage certificate of title, salvage bill of sale or other documentation has been issued showing evidence that the vehicle or vessel has been declared salvage or which has been damaged to the extent that the owner, or an insurer, or other person acting on behalf of the owner, determines that the cost of parts and labor minus the salvage value makes it uneconomical to repair or rebuild. When an insurance company has paid money or has made other monetary settlement as compensation for a total loss of any vehicle or vessel, such vehicle shall be considered to be a salvage vehicle or vessel.

Specially constructed vehicle or vessel. Every vehicle or vessel of a type required to be registered not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles or vessels and not materially altered from its original construction and cannot be visually identified as a vehicle or vessel produced by a particular manufacturer. This includes:

A vehicle or vessel that has been structurally modified so that it does not have the same appearance as a similar vehicle or vessel from the same manufacturer; or

A vehicle or vessel that has been constructed entirely from homemade parts and materials not obtained from other vehicles or vessels; or

A vehicle or vessel that has been constructed by using major component parts from one (1) or more manufactured vehicles or vessels and cannot be identified as a specific make or model; or

A vehicle or vessel constructed by the use of a custom kit that cannot be visually identified as a specific make or model. All specially constructed vehicles of a type required to be registered shall be certified by the owner to meet all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards in effect at the time construction is completed, and all requirements of chapter 9, title 49, Idaho Code.
(q) Specialty off-highway vehicle. A specialty off-highway vehicle as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.

Any commercial motor vehicle transporting, or designed to transport, any liquid or gaseous materials within:

A tank that is either permanently or temporarily attached or secured to the vehicle or chassis and has a rated capacity of one thousand (1,000) gallons or more; or

Multiple tanks either permanently or temporarily attached or secured, when the aggregate rated capacity of those tanks is one thousand (1,000) gallons or more, as determined by adding the capacity of each individual tank with a capacity of more than one hundred nineteen (119) gallons.

If a commercial motor vehicle transports one (1) or more tanks that are manifested either as empty or as residue and that are actually empty or contain only residue, those tanks shall not be considered in determining whether the vehicle is a tank vehicle.

Total loss vehicle. Every vehicle that is deemed to be uneconomical to repair. A total loss shall occur when an insurance company or any other person pays or makes other monetary settlement to the owner when it is deemed to be uneconomical to repair the damaged vehicle. The compensation for total loss as defined herein shall not include payments by an insurer or other person for medical care, bodily injury, vehicle rental or for anything other than the amount paid for the actual damage to the vehicle.

“Vehicle identification number.” (See “identifying number,” section 49-110, Idaho Code)

“Vehicle salesman” means any person who, for a salary, commission or compensation of any kind, is employed either directly or indirectly, or regularly or occasionally by any dealer to sell, purchase or exchange, or to negotiate for the sale, purchase or exchange of vehicles. (See also “full-time salesman,” section 49-107, Idaho Code, and “part-time salesman,” section 49-117, Idaho Code)

“Vessel.” (See section 67-7003, Idaho Code)

“Veteran.” (See section 65-203, Idaho Code)

“Violation” means a conviction of a misdemeanor charge involving a moving traffic violation, or an admission or judicial determination of the commission of an infraction involving a moving traffic infraction, except bicycle infractions.

(r) Tank vehicle.

§ 49-124. Definitions — W.

“Wheelchair, motorized.” (See “Motorized wheelchair,” section 49-114, Idaho Code)

“Wholesaler” means a dealer who sells used vehicles to Idaho dealers.

“Work zone” means a construction or maintenance area that is located on or adjacent to a highway and marked by appropriate warning signs.

“Wrecker” means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily for towing other vehicles that may be disabled. A wrecker engaged in a motor vehicle recovery operation and which is blocking part or all of one (1) or more lanes of traffic shall be designated an emergency vehicle.

§ 49-125. Definitions

X. [Reserved.]

§ 49-125A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-126. Definitions

Y. [Reserved.]

§ 49-126A. Powers of department relating to registration period. [Repealed.]

§ 49-126B. Tax on gaseous motor fuel. [Repealed.]

§ 49-127. Definitions

Z. [Reserved.]

§ 49-127A. Additional use fees. [Repealed.]

§ 49-127B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-127C. Authority to enter agreements. [Repealed.]

§ 49-128 — 49-134A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-134B. Exemptions from operating expenses

Idaho classic motorcycle. [Repealed.]

§ 49-135. Dealers’ plates — Fees

Improper use. [Repealed.]

§ 49-136 — 49-142. License requirements, applications, denials, suspension, revocation — Plates — Fees. [Repealed.]

§ 49-143 — 49-146. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-147. Penalty for misdemeanor. [Repealed.]

§ 49-148. Penalty for felony. [Repealed.]

§ 49-149. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-150 — 49-154. Uniformity of interpretation — Short title — Separability — Repeal — Time of taking effect. [Repealed.]

§ 49-155. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-156. Application for specific numbered plates — Optional with assessor

Fee. [Repealed.]

§ 49-157 — 49-159. [Amended and Redesignated.]